Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201023-114.06
County planning commission; notice
to military installation.

When a county planning commission appointed pursuant to
section 23-114.01 is considering the adoption or amendment of a zoning ordinance
or the approval of the platting or replatting of any development of real estate,
the commission shall notify any military installation which is located within
the county if the county has received a written request for such notification
from the military installation. The county planning commission shall deliver
the notification to the military installation at least ten days prior to the
meeting of the county planning commission at which the proposal is to be considered.

Laws 2010, LB279, § 4.
July 15, 2010